Washington statutes.
RCW 43.80.170

Rule-making authority.

The state finance committee may adopt appropriate rules to carry out the purposes of this chapter, including without limitation rules relating to the responsibilities of state fiscal agents and the responsibilities of the state and local governments with respect to state fiscal agents.

[ 2016 c 105 s 5.]